Utah statutes.
53-3-214 (Superseded 01/01/10).   Renewal -- Fees required -- Extension
without examination.
(1) (a)  The holder of a valid license may renew his license and any
endorsement to the license by applying:
(i)  at any time within six months before the license expires; or
(ii)  more than six months prior to the expiration date if the applicant
furnishes proof that he will be absent from the state during the six-month
period prior to the expiration of the license.
(b)  The application for a renewal of, extension of, or any endorsement to a
license shall be accompanied by a fee under Section 53-3-105.
(2) (a)  Except as provided under Subsections (2)(b) and (3), upon application
for renewal of a license, provisional license, and any endorsement to a
license, the division shall reexamine each applicant as if for an original
license and endorsement to the license, if applicable.
(b)  The division may waive any or all portions of the test designed to
demonstrate the applicant's ability to exercise ordinary and reasonable
control driving a motor vehicle.
(3) (a)  Except as provided under Subsection (3)(b), the division shall extend
a license, any endorsement to the license, a provisional license, and any
endorsement to a provisional license for five years without examination for
licensees whose driving records for the five years immediately preceding the
determination of eligibility for extension show:
(i)  no suspensions;
(ii)  no revocations;
(iii)  no conviction for reckless driving under Section 41-6a-528; and
(iv)  no more than four reportable violations in the preceding five years.
(b) (i)  After the expiration of a license, a new license certificate and any
endorsement to a license certificate may not be issued until the person has
again passed the tests under Section 53-3-206 and paid the required fee.
(ii)  A person 65 years of age or older shall take and pass the eye
examination specified in Section 53-3-206.
(iii)  An extension may not be granted to any person:
(A)  who is identified by the division as having a medical impairment that may
represent a hazard to public safety;
(B)  holding a CDL issued under Part 4, Uniform Commercial Driver License Act;
(C)  whose original license was obtained using proof under Subsection
53-3-205(8)(a)(i)(E)(III); or
(D)  whose original license was issued with an expiration date under
Subsection 53-3-205(7)(h).
(c)  The division shall allow extensions:
(i)  by mail at the appropriate extension fee rate under Section 53-3-105;
(ii)  only if the applicant qualifies under this section; and
(iii)  for only one extension.
